Utah statutes.
77-32a-12.   Collection of payment in default -- Execution.
A default in the payment of costs or any installment thereof may be collected
by any means authorized by law for the enforcement of a judgment. The levy of
execution for the collection of costs shall not discharge a defendant
committed to imprisonment for contempt until the amount of the costs has
actually been collected.
